Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.010

Course content requirements—Access to career and technical statewide equivalency courses—Duties of school district boards of directors—Waivers.

(1) School district boards of directors shall identify and offer courses with content that meet or exceed: (a) The basic education skills identified in RCW 28A.150.210; (b) the graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.090; (c) the courses required to meet the minimum college entrance requirements under RCW 28A.230.130; and (d) the course options for career development under RCW 28A.230.130. Such courses may be applied or theoretical, academic, or vocational.

(2) Until September 1, 2021, school district boards of directors must provide high school students with the opportunity to access at least one career and technical education course that is considered a statewide equivalency course as determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.700.070.

(3) On and after September 1, 2021, any statewide equivalency course offered by a school district or accessed at a skill center must be offered for academic credit.

(4) Students may access statewide equivalency courses at high schools, interdistrict cooperatives, skill centers or branch or satellite skill centers, or through online learning or applicable running start vocational courses.

(5) On and after January 1, 2019, school district boards of directors of school districts with fewer than two thousand students may apply to the superintendent of public instruction for a waiver from the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section under RCW 28A.230.015.

[ 2019 c 221 s 1; 2018 c 177 s 302; 2014 c 217 s 103; 2003 c 49 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 237; 1984 c 278 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.05.005.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2018 c 177: See note following RCW 28A.305.905.

Effective date—2014 c 217 ss 103 and 104: "Sections 103 and 104 of this act take effect September 1, 2015." [ 2014 c 217 s 208.]

Finding—Intent—2014 c 217: See note following RCW 28A.150.220.

Severability—1984 c 278: See note following RCW 28A.185.010.